Utah statutes.
70A-2-718.   Liquidation or limitation of damages -- Deposits.

(1)  Damages for breach by either party may be liquidated in the agreement but
only at an amount which is reasonable in the light of the anticipated or
actual harm caused by the breach, the difficulties of proof of loss, and the
inconvenience or nonfeasibility of otherwise obtaining an adequate remedy. A
term fixing unreasonably large liquidated damages is void as a penalty.
(2)  Where the seller justifiably withholds a delivery of goods because of the
buyer's breach, the buyer is entitled to restitution of any amount by which
the sum of his payments exceeds
(a)  the amount to which the seller is entitled by virtue of terms liquidating
the seller's damages in accordance with Subsection (1), or
(b)  in the absence of such terms, twenty percent of the value of the total
performance for which the buyer is obligated under the contract or $500,
whichever is smaller.
(3)  The buyer's right to restitution under Subsection (2) is subject to
offset to the extent that the seller establishes
(a)  a right to recover damages under the provisions of this chapter other
than Subsection (1), and
(b)  the amount or value of any benefits received by the buyer directly or
indirectly by reason of the contract.
(4)  Where a seller has received payment in goods their reasonable value or
the proceeds of their resale shall be treated as payments for the purposes of
Subsection (2); but if the seller has notice of the buyer's breach before
reselling goods received in part performance, his resale is subject to the
conditions laid down in this chapter on resale by an aggrieved seller (Section
70A-2-706).
